test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex_4uhcad_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - list: # from dictionary
  
    adaluhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: adaluuvčâm
    adaluhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: [adaluš, adalâhš]
    áštáluhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: áštáluuvčâm
    čulgâluhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čulgâluuvčâm
    falâluhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: falâluuvčâm
    falâluhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: [falâluš, falâlâhš]
    hastâluhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hastâluuvčâm
    hastâluhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: [hastâluš, hastâlâhš]
    posolâhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: posoluuvčâm
    posolâhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: [posolâhš, posoluš]
    hárččulâhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hárččuluuvčâm
    hárččulâhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: [hárččuluš, hárččulâhš]
    tiäddálâhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tiäddáluuvčâm
    tiäddálâhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: [tiäddáluš, tiäddálâhš]
    vázzálâhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vázzáluuvčâm
    vázzálâhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: [vázzáluš, vázzálâhš]
    luhâlâhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: luhâluuvčâm
    luhâlâhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: [luhâluš, luhâlâhš]
    cummâlâhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: cummâluuvčâm
    cummâlâhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: [cummâlâhš, cummâluš]
    posâlâhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: posâlââvčâm
    posâlâhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: [posâlâhš, posâluš]
    pačâlâhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pačâluuvčâm
    pačâlâhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: [pačâlâhš, pačâluš]
    
